Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6081.
people of the state of michigan enact: CHAPTER VI Sec. 11b. (1) The Subject to subsection (4), the rules of evidence apply at the preliminary examination except that the following are not excluded by the rule against hearsay and shall be are admissible at the preliminary examination without requiring the testimony of the author of the report, keeper of the records, or any additional foundation or authentication: (a) A report of the results of properly performed drug analysis field testing to establish that the substance tested is a controlled substance. (b) A certified copy of any written or electronic order, judgment, decree, docket entry, register of actions, or other record of any court or governmental agency of this state. (c) A report other than a law enforcement report that is made or kept in the ordinary course of business. (d) Except for the police investigative report, a report prepared by a law enforcement officer or other public agency. Reports permitted under this subdivision include, but are not limited to, a report of the findings of a technician of the division of the department of state police concerned with forensic science, a laboratory report, a medical report, a report of an arson investigator, and an autopsy report. (2) The magistrate shall allow the prosecuting attorney or the defense to subpoena and call a witness from whom hearsay testimony was introduced under this section on a satisfactory showing to the magistrate that live testimony will be is relevant to the magistrate's decision whether there is probable cause to believe that a felony has been committed and probable cause to believe that the defendant committed the felony. (3) As used in this section, "controlled substance" means that term as defined under section 7104 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7104. (4) This section applies to preliminary examinations commenced on or before 90 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection or December 31, 2026, whichever is later. Beginning 91 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection or January 1, 2027, whichever is later, this section does not apply. Sec. 11c. Beginning 91 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection or January 1, 2027, whichever is later, the rules of evidence do not apply at a preliminary examination. This section applies to preliminary examinations commenced 91 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.